Ohio, session 136, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2151.032 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2151.032. (A) No child whose parent, guardian, or custodian allows the child to engage in independent activities without adult supervision shall, solely for that reason, be considered to be an abused or neglected child, provided that both of the following apply: (1) The independent activities are appropriate based on the child's age, maturity, and physical and mental abilities. (2) The lack of supervision does not constitute conduct that is so grossly negligent as to endanger the health or safety of the child. (B) As used in this section, "independent activities" include any of the following: (1) Traveling to and from school or nearby commercial or recreational facilities, including by walking, running, or bicycling; (2) Engaging in outdoor play; (3) Remaining at home unattended for a reasonable amount of time; (4) Engaging in activities similar to those listed in divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section either alone or with other children.